Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Overtime pay. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of overtime pay is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "overtime pay" means wages, salaries, tips, and other employee compensation earned for hours worked in any workweek in excess of the maximum workweek applicable to the employee under chapter 177 or United States Code, title 29, section 207. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end